Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1945.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; ENTREPRENEUR FUND.new text end new text begin $1,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of employment and economic development for a grant to the Entrepreneur Fund to capitalize their revolving loan funds to address unmet financing needs in northeast Minnesota of for-profit business startups, expansions, and ownership transitions. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end